Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1246
Federal boating laws or coast guard regulations; equipment requirements; commission; option to adopt.

The commission may adopt rules and regulations modifying the equipment requirements contained in sections 37-1232 to 37-1245 to the extent necessary to keep these requirements in conformity with the provisions of the federal boating laws or with the boating regulations promulgated by the United States Coast Guard.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 46.